Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB283.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 503.2. Nonbuilding Lots.--(a) The creation of a nonbuilding lot shall be exempt from regulation under a 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 subdivision and land development plan except as provided under subsection (b).(b) The subdivision and land development ordinance shall include all of the following:(1) Provisions allowing for the creation of two nonbuilding lots when presented with a waiver form obtained from the Department of Environmental Protection , as provided for by the act of January 24, 1966 (1965 P.L.1535, No.537), known as the "Pennsylvania Sewage Facilities Act," which declares that there is no present need for sewage disposal facilities on the site and that completion of sewage facilities planning is not required, and two or more nonbuilding lots if the waiver designates that the property is being divided among immediate family members.(2) In the event that the owner or applicant of a subdivided parcel that has been granted a nonbuilding waiver subsequently desires to build upon or develop the property, the owner or applicant shall comply with all applicable statutes, regulations or ordinances in effect at the time of the desired construction or development.(c) As used in this section:"Immediate family member" shall mean a spouse, parent, child, grandchild, brother or sister."Nonbuilding lot" shall mean a parcel of land that does not contain any structure or building that produces sewage, provided that a structure or building not producing sewage is allowed on the site."Sewage disposal facilities" shall mean any sewage disposal system and the associated infrastructure allowed by the Department of Environmental Protection under the "Pennsylvania 20250HB0283PN0228 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Sewage Facilities Act."Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0283PN0228 - 3 - 12